Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-602 Acceptance of
appointment; consent to jurisdiction. By accepting appointment, a personal
representative submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any
proceeding relating to the estate that may be instituted by any interested person.
Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the personal representative, or
mailed to the personal representative by ordinary first class mail at the
personal representative's address as listed in the application or petition for
appointment or as thereafter reported to the court and to the personal
representative's address as then known to the petitioner. [L 1996, c 288, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next